FST/hsi/hsi_verb.foma
read lexc morph_hsi_verb.lexc
define morph

source phonetize_hsi_verb.xfst
define phon

define exceptions x ā y e n -> x ā || _ "^" "progstem",,
    x ā y e n -> x ā n|| _ "^" %<imperfstem (?)+ %+PST,,
    a č e n -> ā v|| _ "^" %<perfstem %+M [%+A|%+B] %+PRS,,
    a č e n -> ā || _ "^" %<perfstem %+M %+C %+PRS,,
    a č e n -> ā || _ "^" %<perfstem %+W [%+A|%+B|%+C] %+PRS,,
    a č e n -> ā v|| _ "^" %<perfstem [%+M|%+W] [%+D|%+E|%+F] %+PRS,,
    s e m e n -> s ā t t || _ "^" %<perfstem [%+M|%+W] (?)+ %+PRS,,
    v a n e n -> v i y || _ "^" %<perfstem %+M (?)+ %+PRS,,
    v a n e n -> v e y || _ "^" %<perfstem %+W (?)+ %+PRS,,
    k a r e n -> k || _ "^" %<perfstem (?)+ %+PST,,
    d i y e n -> d || _ "^" %<perfstem (?)+ %+PST,,
    l i y e n -> l || _ "^" %<perfstem (?)+ %+PST,,
    x ā y e n -> x ā v|| _ "^" %<perfstem (?)+ %+PST,,
    p ʰ e n d e n -> p ʰ i n d|| _ "^" %<perfstem (?)+ %+PST,,
    č ʰ i y e n -> č ʰ e n|| _ "^" %<perfstem (?)+ %+PST;

define prog [vowel - ā] -> e || _ (consonant)+ e n "^" "progstem" ,, e n -> e || _ "^" "progstem";
define suffix %+progsuffix -> may;

define stem e n -> 0 || _ "^" [%<imperfstem|%<imperfstem2] (?)+ %+PRS,,
    e n -> 0 || .#. ~[a č] _ "^" %<imperfstem (?)+ %+PST,,
    e n -> 0 || _ "^" %<perfstem (?)+ %+PRS,,
    e n -> 0 || .#. ~[č ʰ] _ "^" %<perfstem (?)+ %+PST,,
    e n -> 0 || _ "^" %<sbjvstem (?)+ %+PRS;

define inflect %+A-> i || %<imperfstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+B-> e || %<imperfstem _ %+PRS,,
    %<imperfstem -> %<imperfstem2, %+C-> a w|| _ %+C %+PRS, %<imperfstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+D-> ā || %<imperfstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+E-> e s || %<imperfstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+F-> e n || %<imperfstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+A-> d u s u || %<imperfstem %+M _ %+PST,,
    %+A-> d i y o s u || %<imperfstem %+W _ %+PST,,
    %+B-> d i y u || %<imperfstem [%+M|%+W] _ %+PST,,
    %+C-> d u || %<imperfstem %+M _ %+PST,,
    %+C-> d i y u || %<imperfstem %+W _ %+PST,,
    %+D-> d e s a i y a v|| %<imperfstem [%+M|%+W] _ %+PST,,
    %+E-> d ā s u || %<imperfstem [%+M|%+W] _ %+PST,,
    %+F-> d a i y a v || %<imperfstem [%+M|%+W] _ %+PST,,
    %+A-> o s || %<perfstem %+M _ %+PRS,,
    %+A-> i y ā s || %<perfstem %+W _ %+PRS,,
    %+B-> e || %<perfstem %+M _ %+PRS,,
    %+B-> i || %<perfstem %+W _ %+PRS,,
    %+C-> o||%<perfstem %+M _ %+PRS,,
    %+C-> i||%<perfstem %+W _ %+PRS,,
    %+D-> e s ā || %<perfstem [%+M|%+W] _ %+PRS,,
    %+E-> ā s || %<perfstem [%+M|%+W] _ %+PRS,,
    %+F-> ā || %<perfstem [%+M|%+W] _ %+PRS,,
    %+A-> o y || .#. ~[k] "^" %<perfstem _ %+PST,,
    %+A-> ā y || k "^" %<perfstem _ %+PST,,
    %+B-> o v || %<perfstem _ %+PST,,
    s a g e n-> s e g, %+C-> a y i||_ "^" %<perfstem %+C %+PST, %<perfstem _ %+PST,,
    %+D-> ā m|| %<perfstem _ %+PST,,
    %+E-> ā m || %<perfstem _ %+PST,,
    %+F-> ā v a n|| %<perfstem _ %+PST,,
    x ā y e n -> x ā , %+A-> i y a || _ "^" %<sbjvstem %+A %+PRS, %<sbjvstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+B-> e y a || %<sbjvstem _ %+PRS,,
    k a r e n -> k e r, %+C-> a i y a|| _ "^" %<sbjvstem %+C %+PRS, %<sbjvstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+D-> o i y a || %<sbjvstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+E-> i s i y a || %<sbjvstem _ %+PRS,,
    %+F-> a y a || %<sbjvstem _ %+PRS;

define changeV [vowel - ā] -> e || _ (consonant)+ "^" %<imperfstem2;

define cleanC d d d -> d d;
define clean [progstem|"^"|%<imperfstem|%<imperfstem2|%<perfstem|%<sbjvstem|%+M|%+W|%+PST|%+PRS] -> 0;

regex morph .o. phon .o. exceptions .o. prog .o. suffix .o. inflect .o. stem .o. changeV .o. clean .o. cleanC;

save stack hsi_verb.a


down ačen+V+PROG+IND+PRS
down xāyen+V+PROG+IND+PRS
down vanen+V+PROG+IND+PRS
down vadden+V+PROG+IND+PRS
down pačen+V+PROG+IND+PRS
down ačen+V+IPFV+IND+SG+3+PRS
down xāyen+V+IPFV+IND+SG+3+PRS
down ačen+V+IPFV+MASC+IND+SG+3+PST
down xāyen+V+IPFV+MASC+IND+SG+1+PST
down vadden+V+IPFV+MASC+IND+SG+1+PST
down ačen+V+PFV+MASC+IND+SG+1+PRS
down ačen+V+PFV+FEM+IND+SG+1+PRS
down ačen+V+PFV+MASC+IND+SG+3+PRS
down ačen+V+PFV+FEM+IND+PL+3+PRS
down semen+V+PFV+FEM+IND+PL+3+PRS
down vanen+V+PFV+FEM+IND+SG+1+PRS
down vanen+V+PFV+MASC+IND+SG+1+PRS
down sagen+V+IPFV+IND+SG+3+PRS
down xāyen+V+PFV+IND+SG+1+PST
down karen+V+PFV+IND+SG+1+PST
down diyen+V+PFV+IND+SG+1+PST
down sagen+V+PFV+IND+SG+3+PST
down čʰiyen+V+PFV+IND+SG+3+PST
down pʰenden+V+PFV+IND+SG+1+PST
down karen+V+SBJV+SG+3+PRS
down xāyen+V+SBJV+SG+1+PRS
down xāyen+V+SBJV+SG+3+PRS
down semen+V+SBJV+SG+1+PRS
down maren+V+SBJV+PL+3+PRS
